Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§342G-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

"Agricultural solid waste" means the
solid waste that results from the rearing of animals and the harvesting of
crops and that is normally placed in landfills.

"Backyard composting" means the
small-scale composting of organic materials, primarily yard wastes, at the site
where these materials are generated.

"Bimetallic can" means any food or
beverage container that is composed of steel with a tin coating.

"Bioconversion" means the processing
of the organic fraction of the waste stream through biological or chemical
means to perform composting or generate products including, but not limited to,
fertilizers, feeds, methane, alcohols, tars, and other products. This term
includes, but is not limited to, biogassification, acid hydrolysis, pyrolysis,
and fermentation. This term does not include any form of incineration or
methane gas extraction from a municipal waste landfill.

"Compost" means a relatively stable,
decomposed, organic, humus-like material, generated by a composting facility,
that is suitable for landscaping or soil amendment purposes.

"Composting" means a process in which
organic solid wastes, such as biosolids (sewage sludge), green or yard waste
materials, manures, and non-treated wood chips and shavings, are biologically
decomposed and stabilized under controlled conditions to produce a stable
humus-like mulch or soil amendment. This term includes the processing of
organic and non-treated wood waste materials for the generation of wood chips
or other materials that can be used as soil amendment, planting mixes, mulches
for horticultural and agricultural applications, landfill cover, and land
reclamation. The process of composting under methods approved by the
department is a recycling activity. Land application of uncomposted organic
solid waste shall not be considered an approved solid waste management
activity.

"Coordinator" means the state solid
waste management coordinator established within the office of solid waste
management in the department of health.

"Corrugated paper" means a paper
product fabricated from two layers of kraft linerboard sandwiched around a
corrugating medium.

"County coordinator" means the person
within each county government whose primary responsibility is the planning and
implementation of the county's integrated solid waste management plans and
objectives.

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Deposit beverage" means beer, ale,
or other drink produced by fermenting malt, mixed spirits, mixed wine, tea and
coffee drinks regardless of dairy-derived product content, soda, or
noncarbonated water, and all nonalcoholic drinks in liquid form and intended
for internal human consumption that is contained in a deposit beverage
container.

The term "deposit beverage" excludes
the following:

(1) A liquid that is:

(A) A syrup;

(B) In a concentrated form; or

(C) Typically added as a minor flavoring
ingredient in food or drink, such as extracts, cooking additives, sauces, or
condiments;

(2) A liquid that is ingested in very small
quantities and which is consumed for medicinal purposes only;

(3) A single serving of one ounce or less of a
dietary supplement as defined in the Dietary Supplement Health and
Education Act of 1994 (P.L. 103‑417);

(4) A liquid that the department finds to be the sole
item of a meal or diet;

(5) Products frozen at the time of sale to the
consumer, or, in the case of institutional users such as hospitals and nursing
homes, at the time of sale to the users;

(6) Products designed to be consumed in a frozen
state;

(7) Instant drink powders;

(8) Seafood, meat, or vegetable broths, or soups, but
not juices; and

(9) Milk and all other dairy-derived products, except
tea and coffee drinks with trace amounts of these products.

"Director" means the director of
health.

"Disposal" means the management of
solid waste through incineration or landfilling at permitted solid waste
facilities.

"Disposal fee" means a fee that may
be charged on items that will eventually end up as solid waste with the intent
of factoring into the price or use or disposal of the same the eventual cost of
managing the goods as wastes.

"Enterprise zone" means an area
selected by a county and approved by the governor to be eligible for the
enterprise zone program established under chapter 209E.

"Environmental management special fund"
means the fund created by section 342G-63.

"Feasibility assessment" means a
study that analyzes a specific municipal solid waste collection, storage,
processing, or disposal system to assess the likelihood that the system can be
successfully implemented, including, but not limited to, an analysis of the
prospective market, the projected costs and revenues of the system, the waste
stream that the system will rely upon, and various options available to
implement the system.

"Ferrous metal" means any iron or
steel scrap that has an iron content sufficient for magnetic separation.

"Food waste" means all animal and
vegetable solid wastes generated by food facilities and residences that result
from the storage, preparation, cooking, or handling of food.

"Green waste" means leaves, garden
residues, shrubbery and tree trimmings, grass clippings, and similar material.

"HDPE" means high density
polyethylene plastic and containers manufactured from this material.

"Household hazardous waste" means
those wastes resulting from products purchased by the general public for
household use which, because of their quantity, concentration, or physical,
chemical, or infectious characteristics, may pose a substantial known or
potential hazard to human health or the environment when improperly treated,
disposed of, or otherwise managed.

"Incineration" means volume reduction
by controlled burning of combustible solid waste.

"Integrated solid waste management"
means the use of a variety of waste management practices and processing methods
to safely and effectively manage solid waste with the least adverse impact on
human health and the environment.

"Landfill" means a land site on which
engineering principles are utilized to bury deposits of solid waste without
creating a nuisance or hazard to public health or safety.

"Landfilling" means the permitted
disposal of solid waste on land in a series of compacted layers and covering
the solid waste with soil or other materials.

"Manure" means excrement generated by
animals, such as cows, horses, and chickens, held in captivity or used for
agricultural production.

"Mixed paper" means discarded paper
products that are composed of two or more types of paper, including newspaper,
corrugated paper, office paper, computer paper, white paper, and coated paper
stock.

"Office" means the office of solid
waste management in the department of health.

"Permitted disposal capacity" means
the quantity of solid waste, measured either in terms of weight or volume, or
both, that can be processed or disposed of at an existing municipal waste
disposal facility. This term includes only the weight or volume, or both, of
the capacity for which the department has issued a permit. This term does not
apply to any facility that the department determines, or has previously
determined, has failed or continues to fail to comply with: (1) this chapter,
(2) any rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, or (3) any permit conditions.

"PET" means polyethylene
terephthalate plastic and containers manufactured from this material.

"Petroleum" means any petroleum,
including crude oil or any fraction thereof, that is liquid at standard temperature
and pressure (60 degrees Fahrenheit and 14.7 pounds per square inch absolute).

"Petroleum-contaminated soil" means
soil that has been contaminated by a release of petroleum to a degree that
exceeds levels determined to be acceptable by the director.

"Postconsumer material" means a
material that has fulfilled the intent of its original manufacture.

"Processing" means any technology
used for the purpose of reducing the volume or weight, or both, of solid
wastes, or any technology used to convert part or all of solid wastes for
reuse.

"Processing facilities" include, but
are not limited to, transfer facilities, recycling facilities, and
bioconversion facilities.

"Program" means the particular
combination of waste management methods selected by each county and designed to
achieve the objectives of the state and county integrated solid waste
management plans.

"Recovered material" means material
that has been diverted from disposal for the purpose of recycling or
bioconversion. This term does not include those materials that are generated
and normally reused on-site for manufacturing purposes.

"Recycled content" means the
percentage of a good or product composed of postconsumer materials.

"Recycled oil" means any oil produced
from used oil that achieves required standards of purity for use as a lubricant
or fuel.

"Recycled paper product" means a
paper product containing postconsumer material that conforms to the United
States Environmental Protection Agency's guidelines for recycled paper.

"Recycling" means the collection,
separation, recovery, and sale or reuse of secondary resources that would
otherwise be disposed of as municipal solid waste, and is an integral part of a
manufacturing process aimed at producing a marketable product made of postconsumer
material.

"Secondary resources" means
postconsumer material collected and processed for feedstock in a manufacturing
process.

"Sewage sludge" means residual solids
and semisolids resulting from the treatment of wastewater. This term does not
include wastewater effluent discharged from wastewater treatment processes.

"Solid waste disposal facility" means
any facility which receives solid waste for ultimate disposal through
landfilling or incineration. This term does not include facilities utilized for
transfer, storage, processing, or remanufacturing for recycling or reuse, or
bioconversion.

"Solid waste management" means the
entire process, or any part thereof, of storage, collection, transportation,
transfer, processing, and disposal of solid wastes by any person engaging in
these processes.

"Solid waste or municipal solid waste"
means: garbage, refuse, and other residential or commercial discarded
materials, including solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained gaseous materials
resulting from industrial, commercial, mining, and agricultural operations;
sludge from waste treatment plants and water supply treatment plants; and
residues from air pollution control facilities and community activities. This
term does not include solid or dissolved materials in domestic sewage or other
substances in water sources, such as silt, dissolved or suspended solids in
industrial wastewater effluents, dissolved materials in irrigation return
flows, or other common water pollutants.

"Solid waste reduction facility" or "waste
reduction facility" means all contiguous land, including buffer zones,
structures, appurtenances, and improvements on the land used for solid waste
handling. This term includes a facility used as a transfer station, landfill,
incinerator, composting plant, bioconversion site, or recycling site utilized
for the reduction, consolidation, conversion, processing, or disposal of solid
waste.

"Solid waste stream" means the total
flow of solid waste from all waste generators or any segment thereof, that must
be processed or disposed of.

"Source reduction" means the design,
manufacture, and use of materials to:

(1) Minimize the quantity or toxicity, or both, of
the waste produced; and

(2) Reduce the creation of waste either by
redesigning products or by otherwise changing societal patterns of consumption,
use, or waste generation.

"Special waste" means any solid waste
which, because of its source or physical, chemical, or biological
characteristics, requires special consideration for its proper processing or
disposal, or both. This term includes, but is not limited to, asbestos, used
oil, petroleum-contaminated soil, lead acid batteries, municipal waste
combustion ash, sewage sludge that is not hazardous waste, agricultural and
farm-generated wastes that are normally placed in landfills, medical wastes,
tires, white goods, and derelict vehicles.

"State plan" means the integrated
solid waste management plan developed by the department of health.

"Waste diversion" means to divert
waste from the solid waste stream going into waste disposal facilities through
recycling or bioconversion programs.

"Waste evaluation" means a review of
an establishment's disposal practices to assess how those practices can be
improved to reduce waste or recover postconsumer materials.

"Waste reduction" means the reduction
of solid waste by weight or volume, or both, through a variety of methods prior
to disposal. This term includes source reduction, recycling, and
bioconversion. This term does not include incineration and landfilling.

"White goods" means discarded,
enamel-coated major appliances, such as washing machines, clothes dryers, hot
water heaters, stoves, and refrigerators.

"Wood waste" means solid waste
consisting of wood pieces or particles that are generated from: the
manufacturing or production of wood products; the harvesting, processing, or
storage of raw wood materials; and construction and demolition activities. [L
1991, c 324, pt of §2; am L 1993, c 190, §3, c 281, §§1, 3, and c 312, §4; am L
2002, c 176, §4; am L 2013, c 230, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next